Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4792 Y 1
SFX 4792 0 orchesters .
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 0 säule .
SFX 4307 Y 1
SFX 4307 0 ndrucks .
SFX 3963 Y 1
SFX 3963 0 klosters .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 familie .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 splatzes .
SFX 1505 Y 1
SFX 1505 0 chaltung .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 0 se .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 st .
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 0 veränderungen .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 sartikeln .
SFX 1636 Y 1
SFX 1636 0 sartikels .
SFX 3037 Y 1
SFX 3037 0 sspiel .
SFX 3495 Y 1
SFX 3495 0 nbuchs .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 kategorien .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 einlagen .
SFX 4399 Y 1
SFX 4399 0 tionen .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 sgebiete .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 sgebiets .
SFX 3053 Y 1
SFX 3053 0 sfeiern .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 beschaffungen .
SFX 3868 Y 1
SFX 3868 0 beschaffung .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 sstücken .
SFX 4269 Y 1
SFX 4269 0 sgerichten .
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 0 sgerichtes .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 bauer .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 baues .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 apparaten .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 filmen .
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 0 konferenzen .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 felder .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 0 feldes .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 sgesetze .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 sentwicklung .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 serien .
SFX 4159 Y 1
SFX 4159 0 salat .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 rinnen .
SFX 2350 Y 1
SFX 2350 0 register .
SFX 3120 Y 1
SFX 3120 0 ssignalen .
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 0 messung .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 sfunktion .
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 0 llen .
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 0 definition .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 gebieten .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 gebietes .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 gattung .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 sanlagen .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 angriff .
SFX 1053 Y 1
SFX 1053 0 ätze .
SFX 1867 Y 1
SFX 1867 0 instrumenten .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 bilder .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 bildes .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 macher .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 größe .
SFX 3948 Y 1
SFX 3948 0 nplatz .
SFX 3562 Y 1
SFX 3562 0 verarbeitungen .
SFX 2059 Y 1
SFX 2059 0 areale .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 areals .
SFX 2316 Y 1
SFX 2316 0 fächer .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 belastung .
SFX 4952 Y 1
SFX 4952 0 sentwürfen .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 0 antrieb .
SFX 4111 Y 1
SFX 4111 0 blick .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 verzeichnis .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 einrichtungen .
SFX 4200 Y 1
SFX 4200 0 ensystems .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 sbarkeit .
SFX 2659 Y 1
SFX 2659 0 chläge .
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 0 handbuchs .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 siedlungen .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 geschichten .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 len .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 ler .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 skontrollen .
SFX 4051 Y 1
SFX 4051 0 sinformationen .
SFX 2057 Y 1
SFX 2057 0 ausführungen .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 ereignisse .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 igenschaften .
SFX 3753 Y 1
SFX 3753 0 chwankungen .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 ansprüche .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 diskussionen .
SFX 1288 Y 1
SFX 1288 0 hofs .
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 0 icht .
SFX 1172 Y 1
SFX 1172 0 chrift .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 santeilen .
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 leitung .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 abenden .
SFX 4037 Y 1
SFX 4037 0 svermögens .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 foto .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 plattformen .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 anschlag .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 betrachtungen .
SFX 3472 Y 1
SFX 3472 0 schlüssel .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 gläsern .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 ensemble .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 ordnungen .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 sbestimmung .
SFX 2516 Y 1
SFX 2516 0 rung .
SFX 3064 Y 1
SFX 3064 0 nis .
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 0 team .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 status .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 stoff .
SFX 1405 Y 1
SFX 1405 0 teuerungen .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 machern .
SFX 3154 Y 1
SFX 3154 0 machers .
SFX 4826 Y 1
SFX 4826 0 glied .
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 0 suche .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 0 nwerken .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 mäntel .
SFX 4382 Y 1
SFX 4382 0 ventile .
SFX 4230 Y 1
SFX 4230 0 ventils .
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 0 seffekten .
SFX 1273 Y 1
SFX 1273 0 srat .
SFX 1153 Y 1
SFX 1153 0 sregeln .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 boom .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 boot .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 korb .
SFX 1073 Y 1
SFX 1073 0 meisterin .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 architektur .
SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 0 löcher .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 könige .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 0 königs .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 0 nbäume .
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 0 chefinnen .
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 0 ektoren .
SFX 4625 Y 1
SFX 4625 0 loches .
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 0 chirm .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 sendern .
SFX 3129 Y 1
SFX 3129 0 senders .
SFX 3298 Y 1
SFX 3298 0 experimenten .
SFX 3629 Y 1
SFX 3629 0 experimentes .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 stem .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 sten .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 ster .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 stes .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 0 boden .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 entums .
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 0 adlern .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 0 adlers .
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 0 alter .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 marken .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 0 chnecken .
SFX 4094 Y 1
SFX 4094 0 kampagne .
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 0 motors .
SFX 3704 Y 1
SFX 3704 0 shallen .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 arbeit .
SFX 2681 Y 1
SFX 2681 0 treffens .
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 0 experten .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 paket .
SFX 4355 Y 1
SFX 4355 0 bevölkerung .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 ivität .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 trägerin .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 blatt .
SFX 1739 Y 1
SFX 1739 0 abzug .
SFX 3907 Y 1
SFX 3907 0 svereine .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 svereins .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 adressen .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 tum .
SFX 4242 Y 1
SFX 4242 0 sturm .
SFX 4902 Y 1
SFX 4902 0 uppe .
SFX 4691 Y 1
SFX 4691 0 aufbereitungen .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 mitglied .
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 0 isierung .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 0 inrichtung .
SFX 4480 Y 1
SFX 4480 0 kennungen .
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 0 stest .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 ausschüssen .
SFX 4944 Y 1
SFX 4944 0 skampfes .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 0 sgrundes .
SFX 4766 Y 1
SFX 4766 0 sbezeichnungen .
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 0 ta .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 te .
SFX 2948 Y 1
SFX 2948 0 ts .
SFX 3741 Y 1
SFX 3741 0 frakturen .
SFX 2167 Y 1
SFX 2167 0 ordens .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 forschung .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 rollen .
SFX 2235 Y 1
SFX 2235 0 uhren .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 sprozesse .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 objekt .
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 0 weisen .
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 0 chlosses .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 ikeln .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 ikels .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 0 spiegel .
SFX 1129 Y 1
SFX 1129 0 bades .
SFX 4392 Y 1
SFX 4392 0 triebwerke .
SFX 4391 Y 1
SFX 4391 0 triebwerks .
SFX 3115 Y 1
SFX 3115 0 tunden .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 modell .
SFX 4095 Y 1
SFX 4095 0 interessen .
SFX 2699 Y 1
SFX 2699 0 qualität .
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 0 tour .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 aufwandes .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 rock .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 anstalten .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 herstellern .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 herstellers .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 abfall .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 blöcken .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 tischen .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 lerin .
SFX 4201 Y 1
SFX 4201 0 einnahmen .
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 0 säulen .
SFX 3874 Y 1
SFX 3874 0 architekt .
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 0 paare .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 paars .
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 0 sstrecken .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 aufkommen .
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 0 bibliotheken .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 baum .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 baus .
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 0 seffekte .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 einträge .
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 glocken .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 0 abrechnung .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 splätzen .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 nummern .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 meisterinnen .
SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 0 beamte .
SFX 3415 Y 1
SFX 3415 0 dreieck .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 finanzierungen .
SFX 2768 Y 1
SFX 2768 0 nnetzen .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 0 nnetzes .
SFX 4079 Y 1
SFX 4079 0 ntwürfen .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 abschnitten .
SFX 2431 Y 1
SFX 2431 0 abschnittes .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 piel .
SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 0 signale .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 0 signals .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 deckung .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 sfähigkeit .
SFX 4439 Y 1
SFX 4439 0 reifens .
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 0 haltungen .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 funktionen .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 handwerk .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 szenen .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 schirme .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 0 ymbolen .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 0 anstieg .
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 0 sphase .
SFX 4431 Y 1
SFX 4431 0 sbedürfnis .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 blocks .
SFX 964 Y 1
SFX 964 0 sabteilung .
SFX 4149 Y 1
SFX 4149 0 sgeld .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 plätze .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 ausweisen .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 ausweises .
SFX 3156 Y 1
SFX 3156 0 lochs .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 chienen .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 saal .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 sstrukturen .
SFX 4264 Y 1
SFX 4264 0 skapazität .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 absatz .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 santeile .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 santeils .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 ssituationen .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 halt .
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 0 zahlungen .
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 0 geschlecht .
SFX 3730 Y 1
SFX 3730 0 kasse .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 verbandes .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 stermine .
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 0 stermins .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 abhängigkeit .
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 0 auce .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 abstände .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 äpfel .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 archiv .
SFX 3684 Y 1
SFX 3684 0 tagung .
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 0 tiere .
SFX 1550 Y 1
SFX 1550 0 sprinzips .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 estem .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 esten .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 ester .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 estes .
SFX 939 Y 1
SFX 939 0 twicklungen .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 ndorf .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 auftrag .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 bezug .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 einheiten .
SFX 3870 Y 1
SFX 3870 0 auftritten .
SFX 4725 Y 1
SFX 4725 0 tifte .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 nspiel .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 filme .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 films .
SFX 3544 Y 1
SFX 3544 0 affe .
SFX 2806 Y 1
SFX 2806 0 twurf .
SFX 4760 Y 1
SFX 4760 0 sfest .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 portart .
SFX 1165 Y 1
SFX 1165 0 sprojekt .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 ste .
SFX 4233 Y 1
SFX 4233 0 überwachung .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 gemeinschaft .
SFX 1820 Y 1
SFX 1820 0 könig .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 aufstellungen .
SFX 3821 Y 1
SFX 3821 0 öffnung .
SFX 2962 Y 1
SFX 2962 0 ssignal .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 ports .
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 0 bestandteil .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 ntwurfs .
SFX 3699 Y 1
SFX 3699 0 skomponenten .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 0 briefen .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 briefes .
SFX 1676 Y 1
SFX 1676 0 brett .
SFX 4213 Y 1
SFX 4213 0 besatzung .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 faktoren .
SFX 3024 Y 1
SFX 3024 0 um .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 ur .
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 0 us .
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 0 mitteln .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 mittels .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 bundes .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 0 isation .
SFX 3711 Y 1
SFX 3711 0 schloss .
SFX 2615 Y 1
SFX 2615 0 shof .
SFX 4052 Y 1
SFX 4052 0 show .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 verordnungen .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 ansatzes .
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 ockel .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 skonzepte .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 0 skonzepts .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 ssitzung .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 denkmales .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 kammer .
SFX 2004 Y 1
SFX 2004 0 kriegen .
SFX 3276 Y 1
SFX 3276 0 krieges .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 lagern .
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 0 lagers .
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 0 erung .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 sphasen .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 verträgen .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 spielerinnen .
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 0 sprodukten .
SFX 4258 Y 1
SFX 4258 0 sproduktes .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 brunnens .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 grafie .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 bewegungen .
SFX 3968 Y 1
SFX 3968 0 infektionen .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 verordnung .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 fassung .
SFX 2022 Y 1
SFX 2022 0 waffe .
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 0 ohlen .
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 0 iat .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 spannung .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 spflicht .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 bier .
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 0 amts .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 aufsätze .
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 0 parte .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 böden .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 lizenz .
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 0 cheiben .
SFX 3696 Y 1
SFX 3696 0 smessungen .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 zweig .
